Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2891.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2239.1 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The following purchases by the Oklahoma Tourism and
Recreation Department shall be exempt from the Oklahoma Central
Purchasing Act:
1. Merchandise for resale purchased for and sold over the
Internet, in publications or through Department retail outlets, such

Req. No. 12716 Page 1

as l odges, gift shops, golf course pro shops, restaurants, and other
purchases made for the production of such merchandise; and
2. Materials, supplies, and services necessary for the
efficient and economical operation of revenue generating, Department
operated facilities and programs, including those made to maintain
or improve guest perception of quality and service including, but
not limited to, mattresses, pillows, bed skirts, drapery, small
appliances customary in hospitality spaces such as hotel or lodge
rooms and cabins, pool equipment, and pool maintenance costs.
B. The Department is authorized to promote state-owned, -
leased, or -operated facilities. The Department may utilize
specific promotion programs such as the provision of complimentary
rooms, package rate plans, group rates, guest incentive sales
programs, entertainment of prospective guests, employee information
programs, golf promotional programs as well as other sales and
promotion programs considered acceptable in the hospitality
industry, in the travel industry, or the regional magazine industry
are approved as necessary advertising and promotion expenses.
C. For purposes of this section, "revenue generating" means a
purchase that would affect the ability to generate revenue at a
Department operated facility or program. Revenue generated by the
agency is built into the Department's budget to fund operational
expenses and salaries. Loss of revenue will require the agency to
reduce staff or seek additional funding to cover the loss created by
Req. No. 12716 Page 2

dela ys in acquiring goods and services fundamental to generating
this revenue.
D. No exemption provided in this section shall be construed for
the use of leasing or contracting for state-owned restaurants in
Oklahoma state parks.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12716 JL 02/17/25
















Req. No. 12716 Page 3